New Jersey, session 221, A4992.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is appropriated from the Securing Our Childrens Future Fund, established pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2018, c.119, to the Department of Education the sum of $7,650,000 to provide a grant for career and technical education expansion in the States county vocational school districts.  The project grant shall be approved in the amount set forth in subsection b. of this section. b.  The total $7,650,000 amount appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be awarded to the Cumberland County Technical Education Center in Cumberland County. 2.  The expenditure of sums appropriated pursuant to this act shall be subject to the provisions and conditions of the Securing Our Childrens Future Bond Act, P.L.2018, c.119. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.